Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2 LICENSE PLATES
42-3-207. Special plates - rules - new plates - retirement.

Neither the department nor an authorized agent of the department shall collect any fee for the privilege of using a special plate unless such fee is expressly authorized by statute. The department or an authorized agent of the department shall not transfer money collected for the privilege of using a special plate unless such transfer is expressly authorized by statute.

A special license plate shall not be issued pursuant to this section unless such license plate was approved prior to January 1, 2001.

Special license plates that have been approved pursuant to this section shall be retired, effective March 1, 2008, unless such plates are issued for at least three thousand vehicles. The executive director of the department shall promulgate rules to provide standards for the retirement of special license plates not issued for at least three thousand vehicles.

Repealed.

The department shall not issue an approval notification letter to any business entity conducted for profit.

The amount of taxes and fees for special license plates issued pursuant to this section shall be the same as the amount of taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle registration plus an additional one-time fee of twenty-five dollars. The additional fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S.

Before seeking legislative action to authorize a new group special license plate, the nonprofit organization requesting the new plate shall obtain, from the director of the department of revenue, written notification that the group has complied with the requirements for a group special license plate.

The department shall verify that the nonprofit organization proposing a group special license plate has collected the signatures of at least three thousand persons committed to purchasing the proposed license plate.

The remaining inventory of any group special license plate or alumni association license plate that has not been issued to the minimum number of vehicles specified in law may continue to be issued until the inventory of the plates is exhausted.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 2, each organization that issues a certificate authorizing a person to obtain a group special license plate upon payment of a specified minimum donation may increase that minimum donation by ten dollars. Beginning July 1, 2019, an organization may annually adjust the donation increase authorized by this subsection (8) to account for a change in inflation. The organization shall round the inflation adjustment upward or downward to the nearest one-dollar increment.

Source:

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 145, § 19, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1113, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(1)(b)(II) amended, p. 1986, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 286, § 1, effective April 8.

L. 2012:

(2) repealed, (3) amended, and (5), (6), and (7) added, (SB 12-007), ch. 88, p. 288, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2018:

(8) added, (SB 18-046), ch. 46, p. 479, § 1, effective August 8.

42-3-208. Special plates - qualifications for issuance of special license plates.

The following special license plates created by rule by the department under section

42-3-207

, as it existed when the plates were created, are subject to the following requirement:

Repealed.

The department or an authorized agent shall not issue a raptor education special license plate to an applicant until such applicant has provided to the department or an authorized agent sufficient evidence to demonstrate that the applicant is a member in good standing of the raptor education foundation and qualified by such foundation to receive a special license plate or the applicant is a member of the rocky mountain raptor program and qualified by such program to receive a special license plate.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2008, p. 228

, § 1, effective August 5, 2008.)

Repealed.

The "10th mountain division" license plate is hereby converted to a "support the 10th mountain division" license plate. The department shall place the word "support" prominently on the plate to indicate that the owner supports the 10th mountain division. When the registration of a motor vehicle assigned a "10th mountain division" license plate expires, the department shall replace the plate with a "support the 10th mountain division" license plate unless the owner qualifies for a "10th mountain division" license plate under section

42-3-213

. The department shall not charge the fees imposed in section

42-3-207

or section

42-3-312

to replace the current "10th mountain division" license plate with the "support the 10th mountain division" license plate.

The department shall not issue a "support the 10th mountain division" license plate unless an applicant provides a certificate issued by the 10th mountain division foundation, inc., or a successor organization, confirming that the person meets the qualifications established by the foundation for the license plate. The 10th mountain division foundation, inc., may require specific levels of contributions to a 10th-mountain-division grant fund of not less than fifteen dollars and not more than one hundred dollars to qualify for the plate.

On or after January 1, 2016, the department shall not renew the registration of a "support the 10th mountain division" license plate that was issued after August 6, 2014, unless the person meets the qualifications established by the 10th mountain division foundation, inc., or a successor organization, to renew the license plate. The 10th mountain division foundation, inc., may require specific levels of contributions to a 10th-mountain-division grant fund of not less than fifteen dollars and not more than one hundred dollars to renew the plate.

The 10th Mountain Division Foundation, Inc., or its successor organization shall award grants from the 10th-mountain-division grant fund to fund programs, activities, and events that support veterans and preserve and promote the history and spirit of public service of the 10th mountain division.

The 10th Mountain Division Foundation, Inc., or its successor organization shall file an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization. The statement is made under penalty of perjury with the department.

If the department gives at least seven days' notice, the department of revenue may audit, during normal business hours, the records and books of the 10th mountain division foundation, inc., concerning the 10th-mountain-division grant fund. The audit must take place where the records are normally kept or at a place agreeable to both the department and the foundation.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2008, p. 228

, § 1, effective August 5, 2008.)

Special license plates subject to the requirements of this section shall be retired, effective January 1, 2009, unless such plates are issued to at least three thousand vehicles.

The department shall issue firefighter license plates, created by rule by the department under section 42-3-207 as it existed when the plates were created, for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1113, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

IP(1) amended, p. 1574, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(c) and (2) amended and (3) added, p. 228, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 09-175), ch. 226, p. 1027, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) and (1)(d) repealed, (SB 12-007), ch. 88, p. 289, § 2, effective April 6.

L. 2014:

IP(1) amended and (1)(e) added, (HB 14-1089), ch. 189, p. 705, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(4) added, (HB 15-1004), ch. 61, p. 148, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-117.5 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-209. Legislative license plates.

Upon the application of the owner of a passenger car, truck, or trailer classified as Class B or Class C personal property, as defined in section 42-3-106, or the duly authorized agent of such owner showing that such owner is a member of congress from the state of Colorado, the department may assign to such owner registration plates bearing a number together with appropriate words or letters indicating that such owner is a member of the congress of the United States, and a separate number series shall be used to further identify such license plates. Said license plates shall not be issued by the counties but shall be issued directly by the department.

Upon application of an owner of either a passenger car or a truck not over sixteen thousand pounds empty weight showing that the owner is a member of the general assembly of the state of Colorado, the department may specially register the vehicle and assign to the owner registration plates bearing:
(2) (a) (I) Upon application of an owner of either a passenger car or a truck not over sixteen thousand pounds empty weight showing that the owner is a member of the general assembly of the state of Colorado, the department may specially register the vehicle and assign to the owner registration plates bearing:

The letter "H" if the member is a representative or the letter "S" if the member is a senator; and

The number of the senatorial or representative district of the member.

The letter and number combination in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) is the owner's registration number.

A member of the general assembly is eligible for special registration and license plates issued under this subsection (2) for the term that the member is elected to serve in office; except that the registration and plates expire when the person leaves office for any reason.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1114, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (HB 14-1284), ch. 162, p. 571, § 1, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 42-3-112 and 42-3-124 as they existed prior to 2005.

42-3-210. Radio and television license plates.

A person who is the holder of a valid renewable amateur radio, standard radio, FM, or television license issued by the federal communications commission shall, upon application and payment of the additional registration fee prescribed in subsection (4) of this section, be entitled to have passenger cars or trucks that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight registered under the call sign letters assigned to such station by said commission and shall be furnished license plates bearing such call sign letters in lieu of the distinct registration number specified in section 42-3-113.

A holder of an amateur radio license shall not be entitled to purchase more than one set of such special license plates for a registration period. A holder of a standard radio, FM, or television license shall not be entitled to purchase more than ten sets of such special license plates for a registration period.

Such special registration and license plates shall be valid until the end of the registration period and may be renewed for the same term as any other renewal of registration upon application and payment of the prescribed registration fee so long as the holder of such radio or television license is licensed by the federal communications commission.

An additional fee of two dollars shall be collected for each vehicle annually registered that is furnished amateur radio call plates, and an additional fee of five dollars shall be collected for each vehicle annually registered that is furnished standard radio, FM, and television call plates.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1115, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-112 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-211. Issuance of personalized plates authorized.

The department may issue personalized license plates for motor vehicles in accordance with this section.

"Personalized license plates", as used in this section, means license plates that have displayed upon them the registration number assigned to the motor vehicle for which such registration number was issued in a combination of letters or numbers requested by the owner of the vehicle, subject to the limitations of this section.

"Personalized license plates", as used in this section, includes special license plates that bear the words "street rod" and that may be issued only to a street rod vehicle.

Personalized license plates must be the same color and design as regular motor vehicle license plates, must consist of any combination of numbers or letters not exceeding seven positions and not less than two positions except as otherwise provided in section 24-30-2210, C.R.S., and must not conflict with existing passenger, commercial, trailer, motorcycle, or other special license plates series; except that personalized license plates bearing the words "street rod" shall be of a design determined by the executive director of the department, which design shall be different from those used by the state for regular motor vehicle license plates.

If number plates issued for vehicles include the county of vehicle registration, a vehicle owner shall have the option of obtaining a personalized license plate that does not include such county designation.

Any person who is the registered owner of a motor vehicle registered with the department or who applies to register a motor vehicle or renew personalized license registration of a motor vehicle, upon payment of the fee prescribed in subsection (6) of this section, may apply to the department for personalized license plates in the manner prescribed in this section. Personalized license plates shall be issued for the annual registration period immediately following the year in which the application is made.

An applicant for issuance of personalized license plates or renewal of such plates shall apply in such form and by such date as the department may require, indicating thereon the combination of letters or numbers requested as a registration number. There shall be no duplication of registration numbers, and the department may refuse to issue any combination of letters or numbers that carry connotations offensive to good taste and decency, are misleading, or duplicate any other license plates provided for in this article.

A fee of thirty-five dollars shall be charged in addition to the registration fee normally due upon the vehicle for the issuance of the same number of personalized license plates for a vehicle as are specified in section 42-3-201 for the issuance of number plates. Upon reissuance of the same personalized license plates in subsequent years, the additional fee shall be twenty-five dollars. Such fee shall be due upon the original issuance or reissuance of personalized license plates other than a renewal of registration under paragraph (b) of this subsection (6).

The department may provide for renewals of personalized license plates whereby such plates are retained by the applicant in subsequent years upon the payment, in addition to the normal registration fee, of an annual renewal fee of twenty-five dollars for which the department shall provide a distinctive tag or insignia to be affixed to such plates to signify that such vehicle has been properly registered for the year for which such license plate was renewed.

The fee for transferring previously issued personalized license plates to another vehicle shall be twelve dollars in addition to other applicable fees.

A person who fails to apply for the renewal or transfer of issued personalized license plates according to subsection (5) of this section shall lose the priority right to use the combination of letters or numbers displayed on the personalized license plates.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection (6), in lieu of such fees, the fee for a license plate that contains only two alphabetic figures and up to four numeric figures shall be the actual cost of issuing such plate.

All applications for special registration of motor vehicles shall be made directly to the department, and shall be administered by the department. All fees received from special registrations shall be credited to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S., and allocated and expended as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S.; except that two dollars of each such special registration fee collected pursuant to paragraphs (a) to (d) of subsection (6) of this section shall be remitted to the county general fund.

The executive director of the department may prepare any special forms and issue any rules necessary to implement this section.

A person who has been issued personalized license plates may retain the unique combination of letters or numbers of such plate, notwithstanding that the person no longer has a registered motor vehicle, if the person pays an annual fee of twenty-five dollars, which shall be transferred to the highway users tax fund.

This subsection (9) shall not be construed to authorize a person to reserve license plates for which no motor vehicle has ever been registered according to this article. This subsection (9) shall not be construed to require the department to send a renewal notice to the person who retains the unique combination of letters or numbers.

Source:

L. 2005:

(9) amended, p. 143, § 10, effective April 5, (9) further amended and relocated to (7), p. 1185, § 40, effective August 8; (9) added, p. 194, § 1, effective April 7; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1115, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2012:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 12-170), ch. 207, p. 820, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2016:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 16-1362), ch. 319, p. 1296, § 4, effective August 10.

42-3-212. Issuance of optional plates authorized - retirement.

The department may issue optional license plates for passenger cars or trucks not over sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

Optional license plates shall have a background consisting of a graphic design representing the state flag of Colorado and shall consist of numbers or letters approved in accordance with rules of the department.

An applicant may apply for personalized optional license plates. If the applicant complies with section 42-3-211, the department may issue such plates upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6) for personalized license plates. If the applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of optional license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department as required by the department. A person who has obtained personalized optional license plates under this subsection (3) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) to renew such plates. The fees imposed by this subsection (3) shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for optional license plates.

The amount of the taxes and fees for optional license plates shall be the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle plates plus an additional annual fee of twenty-five dollars. The additional fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S.

All applications for optional license plates shall be made directly to the department.

The executive director of the department may prepare any special forms and issue any rules necessary to implement this section.

The optional license plates authorized by this section shall be retired unless such plates have been issued for at least three thousand vehicles by July 1, 2007.

Source:

L. 2005:

(4)(a) amended, p. 143, § 11, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1117, § 2, effective August 8.